Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-205
Encroachment upon airport protection privileges; unlawful; removal.

It shall be unlawful for anyone to build, rebuild, create, or cause to be built, rebuilt, or created any object, or plant, cause to be planted or permit to grow higher any tree or trees or other vegetation, which shall encroach upon any airport protection privileges acquired pursuant to the provisions of sections 3-202 to 3-204. Any such encroachment is declared to be a public nuisance and may be abated in the manner prescribed by law for the abatement of public nuisances, or the municipality in charge of the airport or restricted landing area for which airport protection privileges have been acquired as in sections 3-202 to 3-204 provided may go upon the land of others and remove any such encroachment without being liable for damages in so doing.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 2(4), p. 158.